Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 93
COLORADO MENTAL HEALTH INSTITUTE AT PUEBLO

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 2010 containing provisions of article 13 of this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Section

27-93-101. Institute established.

There is established the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo for the treatment and care of persons who may have a behavioral or mental health disorder from any cause and for other persons in state institutions on an inpatient and outpatient basis and in state programs relating to the treatment of substance use disorders who may require medical care and treatment within the capabilities of the staff and facilities of the institute.

All materials without limitation that contain the former names of the Colorado mental health institute at Fort Logan and the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo shall be utilized to the maximum extent possible in the ordinary course of business before being replaced.

The Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo is authorized to contract, pursuant to the federal government procurement process, with federal agencies to provide psychiatric, medical, and surgical services at the institute to persons under the care of or in the custody or control of an agency of the federal government, so long as the provision of such services does not exceed the capabilities of the staff and facilities of the institute and does not preempt services to state patients.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 774, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (SB 17-242), ch. 263, p. 1377, § 296, effective May 25.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-13-101 as it existed prior to 2010.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 17-242, see section 1 of chapter 263, Session Laws of Colorado 2017.

27-93-102. Capacity to take property.

The Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo is authorized to receive gifts, legacies, devises, and conveyances of property, real or personal, that may be made, given, or granted to or for the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo. The chief officer of the institute, with the approval of the governor, shall make disposition of such gifts or property as may be for the best interest of said Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 774, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-13-102 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-93-103. Employees - adult protective services data system check - publications.

The head of the administrative division overseeing the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo shall appoint or employ, pursuant to section 13 of article XII of the state constitution, such administrators, physicians, nurses, attendants, and additional employees as may be necessary for the proper conduct of said institute. The head of the administrative division may contract with the board of regents of the university of Colorado health sciences center or any other governing board of a state-supported institution of higher education for the provision of services by physicians and other health-care practitioners when deemed necessary for the proper conduct of the institute. During the performance of any duties by the physicians and other health-care practitioners for the department of human services, the physicians and other health-care practitioners are "public employees" as defined in section 24-10-103 (4), C.R.S., and the limitation of section 24-30-1517 (2), C.R.S., shall not apply.

(1.5) On and after January 1, 2019, the head of the administrative division overseeing the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo shall, prior to employment, submit the name of a person who will be providing direct care, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (3.5), to an at-risk adult, as defined in section 26-3.1-101 (1.5), as well as any other required identifying information, to the department of human services for a check of the Colorado adult protective services data system pursuant to section 26-3.1-111 to determine if the person is substantiated in a case of mistreatment of an at-risk adult.

Publications of the institute circulated in quantity outside the institute shall be subject to the approval and control of the executive director of the department of human services.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 774, § 2, effective April 29.

L. 2017:

(1.5) added, (HB 17-1284), ch. 272, p. 1506, § 15, effective May 31.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-13-103 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-93-104. Authorized utilization of medical facilities at institute - equipment replacement fund.

A person committed to the custody of or cared for in the department of human services or the department of corrections who requires medical care and treatment that can be advantageously treated by psychiatric, medical, or surgical care available at the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo may be treated at the institute. Charges for patient care and treatment shall be made in the manner provided in article 92 of this title. A specific appropriation shall be made annually for the general medical division of the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo, based upon projections of the total patient load and associated costs from all institutions, and the department of human services shall determine at least annually the per diem expenses and the actual utilization of the general medical division by each institution, including other divisions of the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo.

A person under the care of or in the custody or control of an agency of the federal government whose psychiatric, medical, or surgical needs could be advantageously treated at the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo may be treated at the institute pursuant to a contract between the institute and the agency of the federal government.

A contract entered into pursuant to subsection (2) of this section shall cover the full direct and indirect costs of services as determined by generally accepted accounting principles and shall include a fee to cover the need for replacement of existing equipment which would occur because of this additional use. All fees collected pursuant to this subsection (3) shall be collected by the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo and shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the equipment replacement fund, which fund is hereby created. Moneys in the equipment replacement fund shall be appropriated by the general assembly on an annual basis to the department of human services for replacement of existing equipment made necessary pursuant to this section.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 774, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-13-109 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-93-105. Alternative uses for institute facilities.

The department of human services shall determine the existence of resources at the Colorado mental health institute at Pueblo that are in excess of the needs of the primary purpose of the institute and may make available to the regents of the university of Colorado, on mutually agreeable terms, a maximum of ten beds at the institute for the purpose of teaching students in the family practice medical training program conducted by and under the control of the regents. The resources shall be a supplement to any existing health-care resources and academic facilities in the region.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 10-175), ch. 188, p. 775, § 2, effective April 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 27-13-110 as it existed prior to 2010.

27-93-106. Access to inpatient civil beds at institute.

The department shall develop and implement admission criteria that ensures individuals, prior to being admitted, have been evaluated for the least restrictive level of care and that geographic location, current health-care provider, and payer type are not the primary determining factor in whether an individual has access to a civil inpatient bed.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-222), ch. 226, p. 2266, § 4, effective May 20.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in SB 19-222, see section 1 of chapter 226, Session Laws of Colorado 2019.